src/twol-sme.txt
"Metaphony in Derivatives -us, -alla, -adda 2"
  Vx:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( NonMPDummy2:) [ Cns: - j: ] (Cns) ( %>: ) ( »: ) X1: ;
			where Vx in (i e7) ;

"Illative Singular Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns ( %>: ) ( »: ) _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) X3: ;
			where Vx in (i a e7)
			      Vy in (á i á )
			matched ;

"Illative Singular Metaphony2" !because of STAHTA: stahtai, commented out beacause -ai illative is only for iija-words
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) W9: ;
            where Vx in (i e7)
	              Vy in (á á )
			matched ;
! Commented in again for the sake of Sijte.
!€ stahtaX3j
!€ stahti0i

!€ Sij9teW9j
!€ Sijte0i

"Metaphony in Px Contexts of Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X2: | X6: ] ;
			where Vx in (i a u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;

"Metaphony in Illative of Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) X3: ;
		       where Vx in (i a )
			     Vy in (á á )
		       matched ;

!"Metaphony in Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X2: | X3: | X6: ] ;
!			where Vx in (i a ) !u)
!			      Vy in (á á ) !o)
!			matched ;

"Metaphony in MUSH-Derivatives"
  i:á => Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) m: u: š: š: ;

"Potential Marker Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q7: ;
			where Vx in (i u)
			      Vy in (e o)
			matched ;



! Stem vowel alternations
! -----------------------

"Stem Vowel in Contracted Stems"                ! fijdnisY5t:fiidnát
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ) Y5: ;
			where Vx in (i a u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;
!€ fijdnisY5t
!€ fiidná00t


"Stem Vowel before Frequentative d"             ! oažžut:oččodit
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q8: ;                         ! coahkut:coagostit
			where Vx in (u)
			      Vy in (o)
			matched ;
! Note that this rule also triggers other contexts than frequentative -d-
!€ oažžuQ8dit
!€ o0ččo0dit

!€ coah'kuX8stit
!€ coa00go0stit

!"Stem Vowel before Frequentative l"
!  i:a <=> Cns _ Q9: ;
! This rule is not implemented, there is no Q9 in the sme-lex.txt file (yet).

!"Stem Vowel before Reflexive s"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Y8: ;
!			where Vx in (i u)
!			      Vy in (á a)
!			matched ;
! This rule is not implemented, there is no Y8 in the sme-lex.txt file (yet).

"Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel"      ! jearraQ1:jearrá
  Vx:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q1: ;                             ! boahtiQ1:boahtá
			where Vx in (a i) ;
!€ jearraQ1
!€ jearrá0

!€ boah'tiQ1
!€ boah0tá0


"Imperative Present 1st/3rd Person and Connegative Final Vowel"
  Vx:o <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q3: ;                             ! jearraQ3n:jerron
			where Vx in (a i u) ;                  ! boahtiQ3n:bohton
                                                   ! čuorvuQ3n:čurvon
!€ jearraQ3n
!€ je0rro0n

!€ jearraQ2t
!€ je0rre0t

!€ boah'tiQ3n
!€ bo0h0to0n

!€ čuor'vuQ3n
!€ ču0r0vo0n


"Stem Vowel Shift a:e, i:e, u:o"                   ! jearra:jerre
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q2: ;                            ! boahtit:bohtet
			where Vx in (a i u)                    ! čuorvu:čurvo
			      Vy in (e e o)
			matched ;
! This is for Prs Du1, Pl3, and 2nd Person Imperative
!€ jearraQ2
!€ je0rre0

!€ boah'tiQ2t
!€ bo0h0te0t

!€ čuor'vuQ2
!€ ču0r0vo0


"Stem Vowel shift i:á"
  i:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ Q4: | Q5: ] ; !1st and 2nd Person Singular Present/before Conditional Marker
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) W5: ; !Dim-freq verbs
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) W6: ; !Sub-freq verbs
!€ boah'tiQ4n
!€ boa00đá0n

!€ boah'tiQ5lin
!€ boa00đá0lin

"Stem Vowel shift u:o"
 u:o <=> Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ W5: | W7: ] ; !Dim-freq verbs, geaffut:geafostallat + stuvvat.

"Stem Vowel shift i:e"
 i:e <=> Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) W7: ; !!Dim-freq verbs, geaffut:geafostallat + stuvvat.
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) W8: ; ! Deverbal nouns -meahttun



!"Stem Vowel before Conditional Marker"              ! boahtit:boađálin
!   i:á <=> Cns _ Q5: ;         !Collapsed into one rule, see above
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Q5: ;                            ! The u:o alternation
!			where Vx in (u i)           ! removed because it gave
!			      Vy in (o á)           ! *čuorvvolin, but Nickel
!			matched ;                   ! gives čuorvvulin.


"Stem Vowel in Dual 2nd Person Imperative"          ! jearra:jearri
  a:i <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Y1: ;
!€ jearraY1
!€ jearri0


"Stem Vowel in Present Participials from i-Verbs"
 a:i <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X1: | X4: | X5: | X7: | X8: | (Hyph) [ # | #: ] | Hyph | s | n ] ;
! a:i <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X1: | X4: | X5: | X7: | X8: | (Hyph) #:  ] ;
! The problem with the old one was that it didn't trigger for Essive and for
! the Px forms of the nominative.
! The new one isn't perfect, the s and n are rather quasi for Ess and Px.

"Stem Vowel in Dual and Pl 1st Person Imperative"             ! jearra:jearru
  Vx:u <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Y2: ;                                 ! boah'ti:boahttu
			where Vx in (a i) ;
!€ jearraY2
!€ jearru0

!€ boah'tiY2
!€ boahttu0


"Stem Vowel in Plural 2nd Person Imperative"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Q2: ;                               ! boah'ti:bohtet
   Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Y3: ;                               ! čuor'vu:čurvot
			where Vx in (a i u)
			      Vy in (e e o)
			matched ;
! Q2 context replaced by other rule for both imperative and other categories
!€ jearraQ2t
!€ je0rre0t

!! boah'tiY4t ! It seems it should be Q3. ... both?!
!€ boah'tiQ3t
!€ bo0h0to0t


!! čuor'vuY4t ! Q2, it seems.
!€ čuor'vuQ2t
!€ ču0r0vo0t

"Stem Vowel in Imperative Plural 1st Person and Passive Stem"
  Vx:o <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ Y4: | Y7: ] ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Y5:) [Cns: - j:i|#:] ;
		   where Vx in (a i u) ;


! Y7 Testing passive forms
!€ jearraY7t
!€ je0rro0t

!€ boah'tiY7t
!€ bo0htto0t

!€ čuor'vuY7t
!€ ču0r0vo0t

!€ jearraY7juvvot
!€ je0rro0juvvot

! Conflict: a:{o,u} <=> Cns _ Y7: {j: / unspecified}

!"Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
!  Vx:u <=> Cns _  Y7: (Y6:) j: ;
!			where Vx in (a i) ;

! This battlefield will be cleaned up, eventually, but we leave it as-is
! for a while, so that Thomas and others can have a look at the ruins.

! New oldrule
 "Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
   Vx:u <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) Y7: (Y6:) j: [[ # | #: ]|m|d|g] ;
             where Vx in (a i)  ;
! for jerrui.


!€ jearraY7j
!€ je0rru0i

!€ dah'kaY7j
!€ dahkku0i

!€ loikaY7j
!€ loiku0i


! Old rule
! "Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
!   Vx:u <=> Cns _  Y7: Y6: j: ;
!            where Vx in (a i)  ;

! Put Y6 into paranthesis, otherwise o:u stem vowel shift doesn't work in Passive+Ind+Prt+Sg3 of
! Impersonals and intransitives. (TO)
! But we don't have passives of impersonals and intransitives, do we ?! So, what was
! the reason for changing the rule? (TT) yes we have passives of impersonals and intransitives:-) (TO):
!arvit+V+IV+Pass+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!arvojuvvui
!arvui


! Stem vowel deletion in compounding
! ---------------------------------------------

"á-stem vowel deletion"
 á:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ] ;

"a-stem vowel deletion"
 a:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ]  ;
           e: _ b: b: o: ( %>: ) ( »: ) [X2:|X3:|X6:]; !Diphthong Simplification in -eabbo comparatives


"i-stem vowel deletion"
 i:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ]  ;

"u-stem vowel deletion"
 u:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ]  ;

"e-stem vowel deletion"
 e:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ]  ;

"o-stem vowel deletion"
 o:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: [ # | #: ]  ;



! Special word final consonants
! -----------------------------

"Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8"                   ! beatnag8:beana
  Cx:0 <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X4: | X8: | X6: Cns: | X9: | W4: ] ;      ! luopmán8:luomi
			where Cx in (DelCns) matched ; ! giellum8:gielu
!€ beatnag8X4
!€ bea0na00

!€ luopmin8X4
!€ luo0mi00

!€ giellum8X4
!€ gie0lu00



"Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8"
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) [ X2: | X7: ] (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
			where Cx in (g8 h8 m8)
			      Cy in (t  t  n )
			matched ;
!€
!€




! Appendix: Deleted rules that still need attention
! -------------------------------------------------





!"Postvocalic j Surfacing"
!  j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | ': | ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+ (Hyph) [# | #:] ] ; !more and more dummies...
!! j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | ': | ( :0 - Y5: )+ (Hyph) #: ] ; !more dummies...
!!  j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | ': | ( :0 - Y5: ) (Hyph) #: ] ; !1.138
!!  j:i <=> Vow: (:0) (Dummy:) _ [(Dummy:* - Y5: -Y6: ) [ (Hyph) #: | Cns: ((Hyph) #:) ]]; ! bad bec. Ess almmájin *almmáiin almmájX4in
!! j:i <=                     _ [Cns | ( DummyNotY5: ) #: ] ;                             ! <============ 1.1 version:
!!!j:i <=> Vow: (:0) (Dummy:) _ [Cns | ': | (:0 - Y5:) [ Hyph #: | #:]] ;
!! Changed because:we get almmáj- and not almmái-
!! Postvocalic j surfaces as i
!! Is this what we want?? without right context??? postvoc j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) (Dummy: ) _ ;


! "Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"  !smirezit : smires, Troandin-bisma
!   Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6: )( :0 - Y5: - Y6: ) [ Hyph | [ # | #: ] ]  ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( :0 - Y5: )( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | #: ]  ; !1.138
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( Dummy: )  ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | #: ]  ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( Dummy:  - Y5: - Y6:  ) [ :0 - Y5: - Y6:] [ Hyph | #: ]  ; ! 1.155
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5   )       [ (Hyph) #: ]] ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5:  )       [ (Hyph) #: ]] ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5: - Y6:  ) [ (Hyph) #: ]] ; ! not vejolaš
! 			where Cx in (z ž m h p g b d)
! 			      Cy in (s š n t t t t t)
! 			matched ;



!"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 2"
! This is no longer a mystery. For once, we ask for the #: symbol in the
! left context. Why we do, is a mystery, but at least now the example works.
! We should thus consider whether the leftmost # is needed in the rule.

!€ #hálijd#
!€ 0háliit0

!$ hálijd#
!$ háliid0

!"Stem Final Consonant Neutralization" !háliidit : háliit
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: Cns* (Vow*) Vow: ( CntrCns:)  _  #: ;
!			where Cx in (z ž m h p d g b)
!			      Cy in (s š n t t t t t)
!			matched ;
!
! Old version:
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _ ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | #: ]  ;
! This one works for all except háliit.
!
! Tentative version:
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: ( CntrCns:) (Dummy:+) _ ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | #: ]  ;
! The nested left context was changed because of háliidit - háliit.
! NOTE: there are 454 jd# that come out incorrectly with this version.

! Overview over j translations.
! j:j # | Cns _                     ! this is default
! j:i     Vow _ Cns                 ! Most common exception
! j:0     Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ]    ! Contracted stems
! j:j     Vow _ Vow                 ! if followed by vow-initial suff


! *) footnote 1
! Older, removed versions:
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ StemCns:* : ;
! This one gave vuovden# as only possible form of vuovdin in compounds.
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
! the problem with this one was that it was not restricted to compounds !!
! The X7: | X8: line was commented out since no lexicon in sme-lex.txt
! pointed from X8 to R. This move should be checked for compounds later.

!"Vowel Shortening in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 2"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ (Hyph) #:  | Cns ] Vz Cns+ Cns: Cns+ _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!			where Vz in (a i o u) ;
!			where Vx in (u i)
!			      Vy in (o e)
!			matched ;
! XXX Remainder! This rule is commented out since including it
! spoils the i:á alternation of verbs (boahtit:boađán, for some reason.
! This should be looked into.
